Washington statutes.
RCW 9.86.030

Desecration of flag.

(1) No person shall knowingly cast contempt upon any flag, standard, color, ensign or shield, as defined in RCW 9.86.010, by publicly mutilating, defacing, defiling, burning, or trampling upon the flag, standard, color, ensign or shield.

(2) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 48; 1969 ex.s. c 110 s 1; 1919 c 107 s 3; 1909 c 249 s 423; RRS s 2675-3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.